North Carolina statutes. Chapter 32A. Powers of Attorney.
Article 1. Statutory Short Form Power of Attorney.

§§ 32A-1 through 32A-3.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2017-153, s. 2.8, effective January 1, 2018.

History.

G.S. 32A-1

; 1983, c. 626, s. 1; 1985, c. 162, s. 1; c. 618, s. 1; 1995, c. 331, s. 1; c. 486, s. 2; 2009-48, s. 11; 2016-53, s. 5; repealed by Session Laws 2017-153, s. 2.8, effective January 1, 2018. G.S. 32A-2; 1983, c. 626, s. 1; 1985, c. 618, s. 2; 1987, c. 77, s. 1; 1991, c. 639, s. 2; 1995, c. 331, ss. 2-4; 1999-385, ss. 1, 2; 2001-413, s. 5.1; 2009-48, s. 12; 2011-284, s. 36; 2016-53, s. 6; repealed by Session Laws 2017-153, s. 2.8, effective January 1, 2018. G.S. 32A-3; 1983, c. 626, s. 1; 1985, c. 609, s. 4; 2007-106, s. 1.1; repealed by Session Laws 2017-153, s. 2.8, effective January 1, 2018.

Cross References.

For similar current provisions, see the North Carolina Uniform Power of Attorney Act,

G.S. 32C-1-101

et seq.

Editor’s Note.

Former

G.S. 32A-1

pertained to Statutory Short Form of General Power of Attorney. Former G.S. 32A-2 pertained to powers conferred by the Statutory Short Form Power of Attorney set out in

G.S. 32A-1

. Former G.S. 32A-3 pertained to provisions not exclusive; reference to Chapter 32B; limitations on authority.

§§ 32A-4 through 32A-7.

Reserved for future codification purposes.